sk-SK: Materiál pre kvetináče: Bambus; Keramika; Betón; Sklo; Kov; Plast; Živica; Kameň; Terakota; Drevo; Iné
ru: Материал кашпо: Бамбук; Керамика; Бетон; Стекло; Металл; Пластик; Смола; Камень; Терракота; Дерево; Другой
pl: Materiał donicy: Bambus; Ceramika; Beton; Szkło; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Żywica; Kamień; Terakota; Drewno; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Материал за саксии: Бамбук; Керамика; Бетон; Стъкло; Метал; Пластмаса; Смола; Камък; Теракота; Дърво; Друго
en: Planter material: Bamboo; Ceramic; Concrete; Glass; Metal; Plastic; Resin; Stone; Terracotta; Wood; Other
zh-CN: 种植盆材料: 竹制; 陶瓷; 混凝土; 玻璃; 金属; 塑料; 树脂; 石材; 陶瓦; 木质; 其他
fr: Matériau du pot: Bambou; Céramique; Béton; Verre; Métal; Plastique; Résine; Pierre; Terracotta; Bois; Autre
tr: Saksı malzemesi: Bambu; Seramik; Beton; Cam; Metal; Plastik; Reçine; Taş; Pişmiş toprak; Ahşap; Diğer
fi: Istutusastian materiaali: Bambu; Keraaminen; Betoni; Lasi; Metalli; Muovi; Hartsi; Kivi; Terrakotta; Puu; Muu
cs: Materiál truhlíku: Bambus; Keramika; Beton; Sklo; Kov; Plast; Pryskyřice; Kámen; Terakota; Dřevo; Jiné
hr-HR: Materijal sadilice: Bambus; Keramika; Beton; Staklo; Metalni; Plastika; Smola; Kamen; Terakota; Drvo; Ostalo
pt-BR: Material da floreira: Bambu; Cerâmica; Concreto; Vidro; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Pedra; Terracota; Madeira; Outro
zh-TW: 花盆材質: 竹製; 陶瓷; 混凝土; 玻璃; 金屬; 塑膠; 樹脂; 石製; 赤陶; 木製; 其他
de: Pflanzkübelmaterial: Bambus; Keramik; Beton; Glas; Metall; Kunststoff; Harz; Stein; Terrakotta; Holz; Sonstiges
hu: Ültetőanyag: Bambusz; Kerámia; Beton; Üveg; Fém; Műanyag; Gyanta; Kő; Égetett agyag; Fa; Egyéb
sl-SI: Material za sadilnike: Bambus; Keramika; Beton; Steklo; Kovinski; Plastika; Smola; Kamen; Terakota; Lesen; Druga
es: Material de jardinería: Bambú; Cerámica; Hormigón; Vidrio; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Piedra; Terracota; Madera; Otros
el: Υλικό ζαρντινιέρας: Μπαμπού; Κεραμικό; Σκυρόδεμα; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Ρητίνη; Πέτρα; Τερακότα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
th: วัสดุของกระถาง: ไผ่; เซรามิก; คอนกรีต; แก้ว; โลหะ; พลาสติก; เรซิน; หิน; ดินเผาสีแดง; ไม้; อื่นๆ
sv: Material för planteringskruka: Bambu; Keramisk; Betong; Glas; Metall; Plast; Harts; Sten; Terrakotta; Trä; Övrigt
it: Materiale del vaso: Bamboo; Ceramica; Calcestruzzo; Vetro; Metallo; Plastica; Resina; Pietra; Terracotta; Legno; Altro
vi: Vật liệu chậu trồng: Tre; Gốm; Bê tông; Thủy tinh; Kim loại; Nhựa; Nhựa resin; Đá; Đất nung; Gỗ; Khác
da: Plantemateriale: Bambus; Keramik; Beton; Glas; Metal; Plast; Harpiks; Sten; Terracotta; Træ; Andet
lt-LT: Vazono medžiaga: Bambukas; Keramika; Betonas; Stiklas; Metalas; Plastikas; Derva; Akmuo; Terakota; Mediena; Kita
pt-PT: Material da floreira: Bambu; Cerâmica; Betão; Vidro; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Pedra; Terracota; Madeira; Outro
nb: Plantemaskinmateriale: Bambus; Keramikk; Betong; Glass; Metall; Plast; Harpiks; Stein; Terracotta; Trevirke; Annet
ro-RO: Materialul jardinierei: Bambus; Ceramică; Beton; Sticlă; Metal; Plastic; Rășină; Piatră; Teracotă; Lemn; Altele
nl: Materiaal plantenbak: Bamboe; Keramiek; Beton; Glas; Metaal; Plastic; Hars; Steen; Terracotta; Hout; Overig
ja: プランターの素材: 竹; セラミック; コンクリート; ガラス; 金属; プラスチック; レジン; 石; テラコッタ; 木材; その他
ko: 화분 재질: 대나무; 세라믹; 콘크리트; 유리; 금속; 플라스틱; 수지; 석재; 테라코타; 목재; 기타